District of Columbia statutes.
2-112

Records.

The Boiler Inspector shall keep in the office of the Boiler Inspection Service all applications made, and a complete record thereof, as well as of all certificates issued. He shall also keep a complete record of each boiler and unfired pressure vessel inspected, and such other records and data pertaining to the Boiler Inspection Service as may be directed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1919, ch. 802, § 11

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1012.
1973 Ed., § 1-712.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.